Utah statutes.
13-43-202.   Land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board -- Appointment --
Compensation -- Duties.
(1)  There is created the Land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board, within
the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman, consisting of the following seven
members:
(a)  one individual representing special service districts, nominated by the
Utah Association of Special Districts;
(b)  one individual representing municipal government, nominated by the Utah
League of Cities and Towns;
(c)  one individual representing county government, nominated by the Utah
Association of Counties;
(d)  one individual representing the residential construction industry,
nominated by the Utah Home Builders Association;
(e)  one individual representing the real estate industry, nominated by the
Utah Association of Realtors;
(f)  one individual representing the land development community, jointly
nominated by the Utah Association of Realtors and the Home Builders
Association of Utah; and
(g)  one individual who:
(i)  is a citizen with experience in land use issues;
(ii)  does not hold public office; and
(iii)  is not currently employed, nor has been employed in the previous 12
months, by any of the entities or industries listed in Subsections (1)(a)
through (f).
(2)  After receiving nominations, the governor shall appoint members to the
board.
(3)  The term of office of each member is four years, except that the governor
shall appoint three of the members of the board to an initial two-year term.
(4)  Each mid-term vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same
manner as an appointment under Subsections (1) and (2).
(5) (a)  Board members shall elect a chair from their number and establish
rules for the organization and operation of the board.
(b)  Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the conduct of the
board's business.
(c)  The affirmative vote of five members is required to constitute the
decision of the board on any matter.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(7)  A member need not give a bond for the performance of official duties.
(8)  The Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman shall provide staff to the
board.
(9)  The board shall:
(a)  receive reports from the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman that are
requested by the board;
(b)  establish rules of conduct and performance for the Office of the Property
Rights Ombudsman;
(c)  receive donations or contributions from any source for the Office of the
Property Rights Ombudsman's benefit;
(d)  subject to any restriction placed on a donation or contribution received
under Subsection (9)(c), authorize the expenditure of donations or
contributions for the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman's benefit;
(e)  receive budget recommendations from the Office of the Property Rights
Ombudsman; and
(f)  revise budget recommendations received under Subsection (9)(e).
(10)  The board shall maintain a resource list of qualified arbitrators and
mediators who may be appointed under Section 13-43-204 and qualified persons
who may be appointed to render advisory opinions under Section 13-43-205.
